Hawaii, session 2026, SB2613.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: PART I SECTION 1.  Act 307, Session Laws of Hawaii 2022, directed the conveyance of the fee simple title to certain lands owned by the department of land and natural resources, county of Kauai, and county of Maui, to the department of education.  Since that time, further verification of information and changes in circumstances require the revision of tax map key numbers provided in Act 307, Session Laws of Hawaii 2022. Accordingly, the purpose of this part is to revise certain tax map key numbers set forth in section 2 of Act 307, Session Laws of Hawaii 2022, for accuracy or changed circumstances. SECTION 2.  Act 307, Session Laws of Hawaii 2022, is amended by amending section 2 to read as follows: "SECTION 2.  (a) Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the fee simple interest to the parcels of land set forth in this section, together with the existing improvements thereon, but not including submerged land, accreted land, or any land makai of the legal shoreline (collectively, the properties), shall be conveyed by their respective owner or owners to the department of education as grantee, as is, where is.  The department of education shall accept the properties in their existing condition.  All claims and liabilities against the grantors, if any, that the department of education has, may have had, or may have in the future, regarding any injury, loss, cost, damage, or liability, including reasonable attorney's fees, concerning the physical, environmental, soil, economic, and legal conditions of the properties, shall be released, waived, and extinguished. (b)  The transfer of a property pursuant to this Act shall be effective by operation of law as of July 1, 2022.  The respective owner or owners of the properties shall prepare, execute, and record, in the [land court or bureau of conveyances,] office of the assistant registrar of the land court of the State of Hawaii or the bureau of conveyances, as appropriate, a quitclaim deed [to convey each of] or other conveyance instrument to evidence and formally document the conveyance of each of the properties together with all existing improvements.  [Work to initiate the conveyance of the properties shall commence no later than December 31, 2022.  As an alternative to conveyance instruments for each parcel of state or county owned land, the transfer of such lands shall be completed by operation of law.] Where applicable and in the discretion of the department of education, the department of education may elect to obtain all or a portion of each parcel identified by this Act.  If the department of education elects to obtain a portion or portions of any parcel identified by this Act, then the parties to the conveyance shall take all actions necessary to legally effect the same. (c) As these are conveyances in which the county and the State and its agencies are the only parties, the tax imposed by section 247-1, Hawaii Revised Statutes, shall not apply. (d) Effective [on the date of transfer,] July 1, 2022, every reference to the titleholder of the properties shall be construed as a reference to the department of education[.] irrespective of whether a quitclaim deed or other conveyance instrument has been recorded in the office of the assistant registrar of the land court of the State of Hawaii or the bureau of conveyances. (e) Parcels to be conveyed by the county of Kauai, identified by tax map key number, are as follows: (1)  (4)2-1-001:009 (Eleele elementary school); (2)  (4)5-2-009:006 (Kilauea elementary school); (3)  (4)1-6-010:010 (Waimea high school); and (4)  (4)1-6-009:023 (portion) (Waimea high school)[; and (5)  (4)3-6-002:010 (Wilcox elementary school)]. (f) Parcels to be conveyed by the county of Maui, identified by tax map key number, are as follows: [(1)  (4)4-8-005:001 (Anahola school); (2)] (1)  (2)3-8-007:004 (Baldwin high school); [(3)  (2)3-8-007:080 (Baldwin high school); (4)  (2)3-8-007:047 (Baldwin high school); (5)] (2)  (2)2-7-008:097 (Haiku elementary school); [(6)  (2)2-7-004:029 (Haiku elementary school); (7)  (2)2-7-004:004 (Haiku elementary school); (8)  (2)1-3-006:007 (Hana high school); (9)] (3)  (2)3-4-009:003 (Iao intermediate school); [(10)] (4)  (2)3-8-007:041 (portion) (Kahului elementary school); [(11)  (2)4-6-002:013 (Kamehameha III elementary school); (12)] (5)  (2)5-3-002:052 (Kaunakakai elementary school); [(13)] (6)  (2)5-2-013:027 (Kualapuu elementary school  public charter school); [(14)] (7)  (2)2-2-014:002 (Kula elementary school); [(15)] (8)  (2)3-8-030:009 (Lihikai elementary school); [(16)] (9)  (2)2-3-009:035 (portion) (Pukalani elementary school); [(17)  (2)3-8-006:008 (Puunene school); (18)  (1)3-2-006:028 (school food services); (19)] (10)  (2)3-4-007:049 (Wailuku elementary school); and [(20)] (11)  (2)3-4-007:003 (Wailuku elementary school). (g) Parcels to be conveyed by the department of land and natural resources or the State, as the case may be, identified by tax map key number, are as follows: (1)  (1)4-7-060:030 (Ahuimanu elementary school); (2)  (1)9-9-005:004 (Aiea elementary school); (3)  (1)9-9-005:001 (portion) (Aiea intermediate school); (4)  (1)2-7-036:007 (Ala Wai elementary school); (5)  (1)1-1-010:041 (Aliamanu elementary school); (6)  (1)3-3-003:019 (Aliiolani elementary school); (7)  (1)3-4-004:049 (portion) (Anuenue school); [(8)  (1)3-4-004:049 (portion) (Anuenue school); (9)] (8)  (1)3-4-004:002 (Anuenue school); [(10)] (9)  (1)9-4-059:072 (August Ahrens elementary school); [(11)] (10)  (1)9-4-059:074 (August Ahrens elementary school); [(12)  (1)9-1-013:003 (Barbers Point elementary school); (13)] (11)  (1)7-4-017:002; (1)7-4-022:050; and [(1)7-4-002:049] (1)7-4-022:049 (central district office Wahiawa); [(14)] (12)  (2)2-2-002:081 (Kihei high school); [(15)] (13)  (1)2-1-009:001 (Keelikolani middle school); [(16)] (14)  (1)2-1-005:002 (Keelikolani middle school); [(17)] (15)  (3)2-5-008:013 (DeSilva elementary school); [(18)] (16)  (4)2-1-001:006 (Eleele elementary school); [(19)] (17)  (1)9-1-163:010 (Ewa elementary school); [(20)] (18)  (1)9-1-069:027 (Ewa Makai middle school); [(21)] (19)  (1)1-6-003:083 (Farrington high school); [(22)] (20)  (1)1-6-003:047 (Farrington high school); [(23)] (21)  (1)1-3-001:058 (Fern elementary school); [(24)] (22)  (3)2-6-020:038 (Haaheo elementary school); [(25)] (23)  (2)2-7-008:098 (Haiku elementary school); [(26)] (24)  (3)2-9-002:005 (Hakalau school); [(27)] (25)  (1)6-6-013:012 (Haleiwa elementary school); [(28)] (26)  (2)1-3-006:008 (Hana high and elementary school); [(29)] (27)  (4)5-5-006:038 (Hanalei elementary school); [(30)] (28)  (4)5-5-006:018 (Hanalei elementary school); [(31)] (29)  (1)5-4-008:026 (Hauula elementary school); [(32)] (30)  (1)5-4-009:004 (Hauula elementary school); [(33)] (31)  (1)3-1-023:054 (Hawaii school for the deaf and the blind); [(34)] (32)  (3)2-3-015:001 (Hilo high school); [(35)] (33)  (3)2-3-015:026 (Hilo high school); [(36)] (34)  (3)2-3-021:058 (Hilo intermediate school); [(37)] (35)  (3)2-3-016:037 (Hilo union elementary school); [(38)] (36)  (1)9-1-102:028 (Holomua elementary school); [(39)] (37)  (3)7-6-004:002 (Holualoa elementary school); [(40)] (38)  (3)8-3-013:021 (Honaunau elementary school); [(41)] (39)  (3)4-5-005:001 (Honokaa elementary school); [(42)] (40)  (3)4-5-005:002 (portion) (Honokaa elementary school); [(43)] (41)  (3)4-5-010:076 (portion) (Honokaa elementary school); [(44)] (42)  (3)4-5-010:076 (portion) (Honokaa high and intermediate school); [(45)] (43)  (3)4-5-012:021 (Honokaa high and intermediate school); [(46)] (44)  (3)4-5-012:025 (Honokaa high and intermediate school); [(47)] (45)  (3)4-5-003:020 (Honokaa high and intermediate school); [(48)] (46)  (3)4-5-005:002 (Honokaa high and intermediate school); [(49)] (47)  (1)9-1-017:160 (Honouliuli middle school); [(50)] (48)  (1)9-4-053:117 (Honowai elementary school); [(51)] (49)  (1)9-1-160:024 (Hookele elementary school); [(52)] (50)  (1)9-1-158:062 (Hookele elementary school); [(53)] (51)  (3)8-6-010:009 (portion) (Hookena elementary school); [(54)] (52)  (2)3-4-009:004 (Iao intermediate school); [(55)] (53)  (1)7-7-001:003 (Inouye elementary school); [(56)] (54)  (1)3-4-007:009 (Jarrett middle school); [(57)] (55)  (1)2-6-029:002 (Jefferson elementary school); [(58)] (56)  (1)2-6-028:005 (Jefferson elementary school); [(59)] (57)  (1)5-1-002:018 (Kaaawa elementary school); [(60)] (58)  (1)2-4-012:001 (Kaahumanu elementary school); [(61)] (59)  (1)4-2-090:074 (Kaelepulu elementary school); [(62)] (60)  (3)7-5-020:077 (Kahakai elementary school); [(63)] (61)  (3)7-5-020:079 (Kahakai elementary school); [(64)] (62)  (1)5-6-006:024 (Kahuku elementary school); [(65)] (63)  (1)5-6-006:003 (Kahuku high and intermediate school); [(66)] (64)  (1)4-3-056:003 (Kailua elementary school); [(67)] (65)  (1)4-2-003:022 (Kailua high school); [(68)] (66)  (1)9-1-001:022 (Kaimiloa elementary school); [(69)] (67)  (1)2-7-024:001 (Kaimuki high school); [(70)] (68)  (1)2-7-024:003 (Kaimuki high school); [(71)] (69)  (1)1-5-005:016 (Kaiulani elementary school); [(72)] (70)  (4)2-3-002:005 (Kalaheo elementary school); [(73)] (71)  (1)4-4-034:029 (Kalaheo high school); [(74)] (72)  (1)4-4-034:028 (Kalaheo high school); [(75)] (73)  (1)1-5-025:001 (Kalakaua middle school); [(76)] (74)  (1)1-5-024:029 (Kalakaua middle school); [(77)] (75)  (2)2-4-032:109 (Kalama intermediate school); [(78)] (76)  (2)2-4-032:110 (Kalama intermediate school); [(79)] (77) (3)2-7-022:003 (Kalanianaole elementary and intermediate); [(80)] (78)  (3)2-7-022:002 (Kalanianaole elementary and intermediate); [(81)] (79)  (3)2-7-025:004 (Kalanianaole elementary and intermediate); [(82)] (80)  (1)9-4-107:098 (Kaleiopuu elementary school); [(83)] (81)  (1)1-5-028:075 (Kalihi-Kai elementary school); [(84)] (82)  (1)1-3-036:015 (Kalihi-Uka elementary school); [(85)] (83)  (1)1-3-008:004 (Kalihi-Waena elementary school); [(86)] (84)  (1)8-5-002:037 (Kamaile Academy  public charter school); [(87)] (85)  (4)3-3-003:042 (Kamakahelei middle school); [(88)] (86)  (2)3-9-019:009 (Kamalii elementary school); [(89)  (2)4-6-002:014 (Kamehameha III elementary school); (90)] (87)  (1)9-4-115:023 (Kanoelani elementary school); [(91)] (88)  (4)4-6-014:031 (portion) (Kapaa elementary school); [(92)] (89)  (4)4-6-014:031 (portion) (Kapaa high school); [(93)] (90)  (4)4-3-003:020 (Kapaa middle school); [(94)] (91)  (3)2-2-020:001 (Kapiolani elementary school); [(95)] (92)  (1)9-1-016:040 (Kapolei elementary school); [(96)] (93)  (1)9-1-016:074 (Kapolei high school); [(97)] (94)  (1)9-1-016:082 (Kapolei middle school); [(98)] (95)  (3)9-6-005:039 (Kau high and Pahala elementary school); [(99)] (96)  (3)9-6-005:008 (Kau high and Pahala elementary school); [(100)] (97) (4)3-2-005:010 (Kauai high school); [(101)] (98)  (4)3-3-003:009 (Kauai high school); [(102)] (99)  (4)3-2-005:011 (Kauai high school); [(103)] (100) (4)3-3-003:015 (Kauai high school); [(104)] (101) (4)3-3-003:007 (Kauai high school); [(105)] (102) (1)1-7-023:041 (Kauluwela elementary school); [(106)] (103) (3)2-5-005:084 (Kaumana elementary school); [(107)] (104) (4)3-7-003:006 (Kaumualii elementary school); [(108)] (105) (1)2-2-009:013 (Kawananakoa middle school); [(109)] (106) (3)1-6-003:102 (Keaau elementary school); [(110)] (107) (3)1-6-003:110 (Keaau high school); [(111)] (108) (3)1-6-003:111 (Keaau high school); [(112)] (109) (3)1-6-003:112 (Keaau high school); [(113)] (110) (3)1-6-003:059 (Keaau middle school); [(114)] (111) (3)1-6-002:001 (Keaau middle school); [(115)] (112) (3)7-4-019:044 (portion) (Kealakehe elementary school); [(116)] (113) (3)7-4-021:004 (Kealakehe high school); [(117)] (114) (3)7-4-019:044 (portion) (Kealakehe intermediate school); [(118)] (115) (2)1-1-008:020 (Keanae elementary); [(119)] (116) (4)1-3-002:001 (Kekaha elementary school); [(120)] (117) (2)2-3-007:032 (Kekaulike high school); [(121)] (118) (3)1-5-009:059 (Keonepoko elementary school); [(122)] (119) (1)9-1-012:060 (Keoneula elementary school); [(123)] (120) (2)2-2-002:043 (portion) (Kihei elementary school); [(124)] (121) (4)5-2-009:048 (Kilauea elementary school); [(125)] (122) (2)5-6-002:008 (Kilohana elementary school); [(126)] (123) (1)9-5-021:001 (Kipapa elementary school); [(127)] (124) (3)5-5-008:024 (portion) (Kohala elementary school); [(128)] (125) (3)5-4-007:014 (portion) (Kohala elementary school); [(129)] (126) (3)5-4-007:008 (Kohala high school); [(130)] (127) (3)5-4-008:021 (Kohala high school); [(131)] (128) (3)5-5-008:024 (Kohala high school); [(132)] (129) (3)5-4-007:014 (portion) (Kohala high school); [(133)] (130) (3)5-3-010:056 (Kohala middle school); [(134)] (131) (4)2-8-010:011 (Koloa elementary school); [(135)] (132) (3)8-1-004:058 (Konawaena elementary school); [(136)] (133) (3)8-1-005:011 (Konawaena high school); [(137)] (134) (3)8-1-005:013 (Konawaena high school); [(138)] (135) (3)8-1-002:038 (portion) (Konawaena high school); [(139)] (136) (3)8-1-002:038 (portion) (Konawaena middle school); [(140)] (137) (1)2-7-017:029 (Kuhio elementary school); [(141)] (138) (1)2-7-027:022 (Kuhio elementary school); [(142)] (139) (2)4-6-018:013 (portion) (Lahaina intermediate school); [(143)] (140) (2)4-5-034:035 (Lahaina intermediate school); [(144)] (141) (2)4-6-018:005 (Lahainaluna high school); [(145)] (142) (2)4-6-018:007 (Lahainaluna high school); [(146)] (143) (2)4-6-018:012 (Lahainaluna high school); [(147)] (144) (1)5-5-015:033 (Laie elementary school); [(148)] (145) (2)4-9-014:003 (Lanai high and elementary school); [(149)] (146) (2)4-9-014:004 (Lanai high and elementary school); [(150)] (147) (1)1-7-042:001 (Lanakila elementary school); [(151)] (148) (3)3-5-005:001 (Laupahoehoe community  public charter school); [(152)] (149) (3)3-5-004:059 (Laupahoehoe community  public charter school); [(153)] (150) (3)3-5-004:026 (Laupahoehoe community  public charter school); [(154)] (151) (1)8-6-001:054 (Leihoku elementary school); [(155)] (152) (1)1-6-008:021 (Likelike elementary school); [(156)] (153) (1)1-6-008:023 (Likelike elementary school); [(157)] (154) (1)9-1-017:108 (department of education); [(158)] (155) (1)2-4-033:013 (Lincoln elementary school); [(159)] (156) (2)2-2-002:043 (portion) (Lokelani intermediate school); [(160)] (157) (1)2-3-030:052 (Lunalilo elementary school); [(161)] (158) (1)1-8-005:008 (Maemae elementary school); [(162)] (159) (1)1-8-005:012 (Maemae elementary school); [(163)] (160) (1)9-2-009:082 (Makakilo elementary school); [(164)] (161) (1)9-9-075:028 (Makalapa elementary school); [(165)] (162) (2)2-4-005:010 (Makawao elementary school); [(166)] (163) (1)9-7-068:005 (Manana elementary school); [(167)] (164) (2)3-8-007:098 (Maui high school); [(168)] (165) (2)3-8-007:002 (Maui Waena intermediate school); [(169)] (166) (1)9-2-019:022 (Mauka Lani elementary school); [(170)] (167) (1)4-2-043:001 (Maunawili elementary school); [(171)] (168) (1)2-3-009:001 (McKinley high school); [(172)  (reserved); (173)  (reserved); (174)] (169) (1)9-5-001:054 (Mililani high school); [(175)] (170) (1)9-5-001:055 (Mililani high school); [(176)] (171) (1)9-5-002:046 (Mililani Ike elementary school); [(177)] (172) (1)9-5-049:006 (Mililani Mauka elementary school); [(178)] (173) (1)9-5-002:040 (Mililani middle school); [(179)  (reserved); (180)] (174) (1)9-4-005:047 (Mililani Uka elementary school); [(181)] (175) (1)9-5-001:039 (Mililani Waena elementary school); [(182)] (176) (1)1-1-063:011 (Moanalua high school); [(183)] (177) (2)5-2-015:001 (portion) (Molokai high school); [(184)] (178) (2)5-2-007:001 (Molokai high school); [(185)] (179) (2)5-2-015:001 (portion) (Molokai middle school); [(186)] (180) (1)9-7-025:004 (portion) (Momilani elementary school); [(187)] (181) (3)1-8-001:007 (Mountain View elementary school); [(188)] (182) (3)9-5-009:006 (Naalehu elementary school); [(189)] (183) (2)4-6-018:013 (portion) (Nahienaena elementary school); [(190)] (184) (1)8-9-002:065 (Nanaikapono elementary school); [(191)] (185) (1)8-9-007:009 (portion) (Nanakuli elementary school); [(192)] (186) (1)8-9-007:009 (portion) (Nanakuli high and intermediate school); [(193)] (187) (4)4-2-006:002 (portion) (Olomana school); [(194)] (188) (3)4-3-003:032 (Paauilo elementary and intermediate school); [(195)] (189) (3)4-3-003:024 (Paauilo elementary and intermediate school); [(196)] (190) (3)1-5-114:025 (Pahoa elementary school); [(197)] (191) (3)1-5-114:002 (Pahoa elementary school); [(198)] (192) (3)1-5-114:026 (Pahoa high and intermediate school); [(199)] (193) (3)1-5-003:038 (Pahoa high and intermediate school); [(200)] (194) (2)2-5-005:004 (Paia elementary school); [(201)] (195) (1)3-4-002:002 (Palolo elementary school); [(202)] (196) (1)4-5-017:001 (Parker elementary school); [(203)] (197) (1)9-7-025:004 (portion) (Pearl City high school); [(204)  (reserved); (205)] (198) (1)9-9-001:012 (Pearl Harbor Kai elementary school); [(206)] (199) (1)9-8-013:028 (Pearl Ridge elementary school); [(207)] (200) (2)3-8-007:156 (Pomaikai elementary school); [(208)] (201) (1)4-1-031:041 (Pope elementary school); [(209)] (202) (1)4-1-031:040 (Pope elementary school); [(210)] (203) (2)3-5-001:103 (Puu Kukui elementary school); [(211)] (204) (2)3-8-006:008 (Puunene school); [(212)] (205) (1)9-9-071:053 (Radford high school); [(213)] (206) (1)1-1-012:028 (Red Hill elementary school); [(214)] (207) (1)2-4-032:001 (Roosevelt high school); [(215)] (208) (1)2-1-020:001 (Royal elementary school); [(216)] (209) (1)1-1-063:013 (Salt Lake elementary school); (210)  (1)3-2-006:028 (school food services); [(217)] (211) (1)1-1-008:008 (Shafter elementary school); [(218)] (212) (1)2-4-033:013 (Stevenson middle school); [(219)] (213) (1)5-9-005:018 (Sunset Beach elementary school); [(220)] (214) (3)1-9-004:019 (Volcano school of arts and sciences); [(221)] (215) (1)7-6-001:003 (Wahiawa middle school); [(222)] (216) (1)7-6-001:004 (Wahiawa middle school); [(223)] (217) (1)4-8-009:010 (Waiahole elementary school); [(224)] (218) (3)2-4-001:015 (portion) (Waiakea elementary school); [(225)] (219) (3)2-4-001:015 (portion) (Waiakea high school); [(226)] (220) (3)2-4-001:015 (portion) (Waiakea intermediate school); [(227)] (221) (3)2-2-042:017 (Waiakeawaena elementary school); [(228)] (222) (3)2-2-042:007 (Waiakeawaena elementary school); [(229)] (223) (1)6-7-002:009 (Waialua high and intermediate school); [(230)] (224) (1)6-7-002:030 (Waialua high and intermediate school); [(231)] (225) (1)6-7-002:029 (Waialua high and intermediate school); [(232)] (226) (1)8-5-009:018 (Waianae elementary school); [(233)] (227) (1)8-5-002:018 (Waianae high school); [(234)] (228) (1)8-5-028:042 (Waianae intermediate school); [(235)] (229) (1)9-8-050:071 (Waiau elementary school); [(236)] (230) (2)3-2-007:021 (Waihee elementary school); [(237)] (231) (1)9-4-007:069 (Waikele elementary school); [(238)] (232) (1)9-4-007:068 (Waikele elementary school); [(239)] (233) (3)6-8-002:038 (Waikoloa school); [(240)] (234) (2)3-4-007:001 (Wailuku elementary school); [(241)] (235) (2)3-4-007:020 (Wailuku elementary school); [(242)  (reserved); (243)] (236) (1)4-1-009:012 (portion) (Waimanalo elementary and intermediate school); [(244)] (237) (4)1-2-006:033 (Waimea Canyon school); [(245)] (238) (3)6-7-002:015 (portion) (Waimea elementary school); [(246)] (239) (4)1-6-010:004 (Waimea high school); [(247)] (240) (3)6-7-002:015 (portion) (Waimea middle school  public charter school); [(248)] (241) (1)9-4-010:040 (Waipahu elementary school); [(249)] (242) [(1)9-4-008-025] (1)9-4-008:025 (Waipahu high school); [(250)] (243) (1)9-4-001:030 (Waipahu intermediate school); [(251)] (244) (1)9-9-005:001 (portion) (Webling elementary school); [(252)] (245) (1)7-7-001:002 (Wheeler elementary school); [(253)] (246) (1)7-7-001:002 (Wheeler middle school); [(254)] (247) (4)3-6-002:021 (Wilcox elementary school); and [(255)] (248) (4)3-6-002:022 (Wilcox elementary school)." PART II SECTION 3.  The department of education shall transfer fee simple title ownership of the parcel of land identified as the following tax map key: (4)3-6-002:010 (Wilcox elementary school) to the county of Kauai; provided that the county of Kauai shall accept the property in its existing condition.  All claims and liabilities against the department of education, if any, that the county of Kauai has, may have had, or may have in the future, regarding any injury, loss, cost, damage, or liability, including reasonable attorney's fees, concerning the physical, environmental, soil, economic, and legal conditions of the properties, shall be released, waived, and extinguished; provided further that as this is a conveyance in which the county and the State and its agencies are the only parties, the tax imposed by section 247-1, Hawaii Revised Statutes, shall not apply. SECTION 4. The city and county of Honolulu shall transfer fee simple title ownership of the parcel of land identified as the following parcel no: 320590020000 and tax map key (1)3-2-059:002 (Kaimuki middle school) to the department of education; provided that the department of education shall accept the property in its existing condition.  All claims and liabilities against the city and county of Honolulu, if any, that the department of education has, may have had, or may have in the future, regarding any injury, loss, cost, damage, or liability, including reasonable attorney's fees, concerning the physical, environmental, soil, economic, and legal conditions of the properties, shall be released, waived, and extinguished; provided further that as this is a conveyance in which the county and the State and its agencies are the only parties, the tax imposed by section 247-1, Hawaii Revised Statutes, shall not apply. PART III SECTION 5.  (a) Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the fee simple interest to the parcels of land set forth in this section, together with the existing improvements thereon, but not including submerged land, accreted land, or any land makai of the legal shoreline (collectively, the properties), shall be conveyed by the department of education to the department of land and natural resources as grantee, as is, where is. The department of land and natural resources shall accept the properties in their existing condition.  All claims and liabilities against the grantors, if any, that the department of land and natural resources has, may have had, or may have in the future, regarding any injury, loss, cost, damage, or liability, including reasonable attorney's fees, concerning the physical, environmental, soil, economic, and legal conditions of the properties, shall be released, waived, and extinguished. (b) The department of education shall prepare, execute, and record, in the office of the assistant registrar of the land court of the State of Hawaii or the bureau of conveyances, as appropriate, a quitclaim deed to convey each of the properties together with all existing improvements.  Work to initiate the conveyance of the properties shall commence no later than December 31, 2026.  As an alternative to conveyance instruments for each parcel of state or county owned land, the transfer of such lands shall be completed by operation of law.  Where applicable and in the discretion of the department of land and natural resources, the department of land and natural resources may elect to obtain all or a portion of each parcel identified by this section.  If the department of land and natural resources elects to obtain a portion or portions of any parcel identified by this section, then the parties to the conveyance shall take all actions necessary to legally effect the same. (c) As these are conveyances in which the county and the State and its agencies are the only parties, the tax imposed by section 247-1, Hawaii Revised Statutes, shall not apply. (d) Effective on the date of transfer, every reference to the titleholder of the properties shall be construed as a reference to the department of land and natural resources. (e) Parcels to be conveyed by the department of education, identified by tax map key number, are as follows: (1)  9-1-001:002 (Ewa Beach public and school library); (2)  5-6-006:003 (Kahuku public and school library); (3)  4-1-009:012 (Waimanalo public and school library); (4)  1-6-002:001 (Keaau public and school library); (5)  3-5-005:001 (Laupahoehoe public and school library); (6)  1-8-001:007 (Mountain View public and school library); (7)  9-6-005:008 (Pahala public and school library); (8)  1-5-003:038 (Pahoa public and school library); (9)  6-7-002:024 (Thelma Parker memorial public and school library); (10)  4-9-014:003 (Lanai public and school library); (11)  1-3-006:008 (Hana public and school library); and (12)  2-8-010:011 (Koloa public and school library). PART IV SECTION 6.  The purpose of this part is to revise the process by which properties were, or may in the future be, conveyed to the department of education pursuant to Act 307, Session Laws of Hawaii 2022. SECTION 7.  Section 302A-1148, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows: "(a)  All public school buildings, facilities, and grounds shall be available for general recreational purposes, and for public and community use, whenever these activities do not interfere with the normal and usual activities of the school and its pupils.  Any other law to the contrary notwithstanding, the department shall adopt rules under chapter 91 as are deemed necessary to carry out the purposes of this section and may issue licenses, revocable permits, concessions, or rights of entry to school buildings and grounds for [such] periods of use as deemed appropriate by the department.  [All such dispositions, including those in excess of fourteen days, need not be approved by the board of land and natural resources; provided that approval by the board of land and natural resources shall be required when the dispositions are for periods in excess of a year.]  The department may assess and collect fees and charges from the users of school buildings, facilities, grounds, and equipment, which include fees and charges assessed and collected by the department for parking on roadways and in parking areas under the jurisdiction of the department, pursuant to section 302A-1151.6.  The fees and charges shall be deposited into a separate fund and expended by the department under rules as may be adopted by the board; provided that any parking fees assessed and collected by a school shall be deposited to the credit of that school's nonappropriated local school fund account." SECTION 8.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 9.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 3000.